Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.357

Neighborhood electric vehicle.

"Neighborhood electric vehicle" means a self-propelled, electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500.

[ 2003 c 353 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 353: See note following RCW 46.04.320.